Massachusetts, session 194th, HD4315.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 2BBBBBB of Chapter 29 of the General Laws, as so appearing in
the most recent Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after subsection (b) the
following:- "In any fiscal year, no appropriation shall be made from the fund for any purpose
unless and until an appropriation has first been made to fully fund the special education
reimbursement program requirements under Chapter 71B, Section 5A, subsection (c), for the
same fiscal year.”
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
of 1